Hawaii, session 2026, SB2113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that, in 2021, the State became the first state to declare a climate emergency.  In a press release on December 8, 2023, the United Nations Environment Programme reported that "[t]he animal agriculture industry is a major driver of climate change," accounting for up to twenty per cent of global greenhouse gas emissions. The legislature further finds that jurisdictions that have adopted plant-based-by-default policies have reported significant reductions in their negative impacts to climate change. Accordingly, the State can more efficiently respond to climate change and the climate emergency by reducing governmental preferences for animal-based food and drinks and by establishing plant-based food and drinks as the default choices at state-operated prisons, state-licensed hospitals, and government-sponsored events. The legislature believes that a plant-based-by-default policy for state-operated prisons, state-licensed hospitals, and government-sponsored events provides many additional benefits to the State, including: (1)  Significant savings of taxpayer money; (2)  The promotion of traditional Hawaiian environmental, dietary, and cultural practices; (3)  The advancement of public health, including reduction in dietary risk factors for diabetes, cardiovascular disease, and cancer; and (4)  An increase in the demand for and consumption of local fruits and vegetables, which supports economic opportunities for farmers throughout the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a plant-based-by-default policy for state-operated prisons, state‑licensed hospitals, and government-sponsored events. SECTION 2. Chapter 353, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§353- Food and drinks for committed persons; plant‑based-by-default program. (a)  The director shall establish a plant-based-by-default program for committed persons' food and drinks. (b)  Under the program, the department shall offer committed persons only plant-based food products by default; provided that any committed person may opt out of the default options. (c)  The director shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 to implement this section. (d) The director shall submit annual reports on the program's results to the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission. (e)  As used in this section, "plant-based food products" means food and drinks that do not contain meat, poultry, fish, dairy, eggs, or other animal products or byproducts." SECTION 3.  Section 26-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The department shall: (1)  Preaudit and conduct after-the-fact audits of the financial accounts of all state departments to determine the legality of expenditures and the accuracy of accounts; (2)  Report to the governor and to each regular session of the legislature as to the finances of each department of the State; (3)  Administer the state risk management program; (4)  Establish and manage motor pools; (5)  Manage the preservation and disposal of all records of the State; (6)  Undertake the program of centralized engineering and office leasing services, including operation and maintenance and lease buyback processing pursuant to subsection (d) of public buildings, for departments of the State; (7)  Undertake the functions of the state surveyor; (8)  Establish accounting and internal control systems; (9)  Have the discretion to employ persons within the comptroller's office who shall be exempt from chapters 76 and 89 in support of communications, change management, and business process improvement programs as part of the State's information technology modernization efforts; provided that the persons shall be members of the state employees' retirement system and shall be eligible to receive the benefits of any state employee benefit program generally applicable to officers and employees of the State; (10)  Provide centralized computer information management and processing services through the chief information officer; (11)  Establish a program to provide a means for public access to public information and develop an information network for state government; (12)  Assume administrative responsibility for the office of information practices; [and] (13)  Approve state fleet acquisitions; provided that: (A)  Beginning January 1, 2022, all new light-duty motor vehicles that are passenger cars purchased for the State's fleet shall be zero-emission vehicles; (B)  Beginning as soon as practicable but no later than January 1, 2030, all new light-duty motor vehicles that are multipurpose passenger vehicles and trucks for the State's fleet shall be zero‑emission vehicles; and (C)  The comptroller may authorize an exemption for new fleet vehicle purchases if zero-emission vehicles are demonstrated to be cost-prohibitive on a lifecycle basis or unsuitable for the vehicles' planned purpose, or if funds are unavailable[.]; and (14)  Establish a plant-based-by-default program for government-sponsored events.  Under the program, attendees at government-sponsored events shall be offered only plant-based food products by default; provided that any attendee may opt out of the default options.  The comptroller shall submit annual reports on the program's results to the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission.  The department shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 to implement the program. For the purposes of this subsection: "Government-sponsored event" means a gathering at a facility under the management and control of any state department during which food and drinks are offered to attendees. "Light-duty motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in title 10 Code of Federal Regulations part 490. "Multipurpose passenger vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 571.3. "Passenger car" has the same meaning as defined in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 571.3. "Plant-based food products" means food and drinks that do not contain meat, poultry, fish, dairy, eggs, or other animal products or byproducts. "Truck" has the same meaning as defined in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 571.3. "Zero-emission vehicle" has the same meaning as specified in title 40 Code of Federal Regulations section 88.1." SECTION 4.  Section 321-14.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§321-14.5  Hospitals; licensing.  (a)  All hospitals shall be licensed by the department to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the individuals placed therein. (b)  The director shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 that shall provide for the licensing of hospitals. (c)  The rules may provide that accreditation by The Joint Commission demonstrates a hospital's compliance with all licensing inspections required by the State.  The rules may exempt a hospital from a licensing inspection on a continuing basis throughout the term of the accreditation under the following conditions: (1)  The hospital provides the department with a certified copy of the hospital's official accreditation report from The Joint Commission; (2)  The hospital continuously holds full accreditation by The Joint Commission; and (3)  The hospital holds a current and valid state license. (d)  The rules shall provide that the department may conduct inspections and investigations of exempt hospitals to investigate complaints, follow up on adverse accreditation findings, or conduct periodic validation surveys. (e)  Information contained in reports of survey and official accreditation letters made by The Joint Commission used in determining compliance with licensing requirements shall be public information. (f)  All other records maintained by the department shall be governed by chapter 92F. (g) The rules shall provide that each hospital shall establish a plant-based-by-default program for patients' food and drinks.  Under the program, each hospital shall offer patients only plant-based food products by default; provided that any patient may opt out of the default options.  As used in this subsection, "plant-based food products" means food and drinks that do not contain meat, poultry, fish, dairy, eggs, or other animal products or byproducts.  The director of health shall submit annual reports on the program's results to the Hawaii climate change mitigation and adaptation commission." SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________